Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-3322
District; land not included.

Any land which in the judgment of the mayor and city council will not be benefited shall not be included in an offstreet parking district under the Offstreet Parking District Act.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 22, p. 207;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-833;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 22, p. 449;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 201.